apertium-kmr.kmr.dix
    <pardef n="kar/în_past">
        <e r="LR"><p><l>ibû</l><r><s n="plu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>ibûyî</l><r><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>ibûm</l><r><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>ibûn</l><r><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>ibûn</l><r><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>ibûn</l><r><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>î<b/>bû</l><r><s n="plu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>î<b/>bûyî</l><r><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>î<b/>bûm</l><r><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>î<b/>bûn</l><r><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>î<b/>bûn</l><r><s n="plu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>î<b/>bûn</l><r><s n="plu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>î</l><r><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="nikar/în_past">
        <e r="LR"><p><l>ibû</l><r><s n="neg"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>ibûyî</l><r><s n="neg"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>ibûm</l><r><s n="neg"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>ibûn</l><r><s n="neg"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>ibûn</l><r><s n="neg"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>ibûn</l><r><s n="neg"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>î<b/>bû</l><r><s n="neg"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>î<b/>bûyî</l><r><s n="neg"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>î<b/>bûm</l><r><s n="neg"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>î<b/>bûn</l><r><s n="neg"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>î<b/>bûn</l><r><s n="neg"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>î<b/>bûn</l><r><s n="neg"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>î</l><r><s n="neg"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="plu_tv">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="kar/în_past"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="plu_neg_tv">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/></r></p><par n="nikar/în_past"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="plu_iv">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="kar/în_past"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="plu_neg_iv">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="nikar/în_past"/></e>
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="kir/__vblex"> 
        <e><p><l>im</l><r><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>î</l><r><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>in</l><r><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>in</l><r><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>in</l><r><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>in</l><r><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
         <e><p><l>ime</l><r><s n="narr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>iye</l><r><s n="narr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="narr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ine</l><r><s n="narr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ine</l><r><s n="narr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ine</l><r><s n="narr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ine</l><r><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>î</l><r><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<!--        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="narr"/></r></p><par n="k/e__vblex"/></e>-->
<!--    <e><p><l>iye</l><r><s n="perf"/></r></p></e>  CHECK LATER -->
        <e><p><l>ibû</l><r><s n="plu"/></r></p><par n="şo/__vblex"/></e>
        <e><p><l>ibim</l><r><s n="fpi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ibî</l><r><s n="fpi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ibe</l><r><s n="fpi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ibin</l><r><s n="fpi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 


    <pardef n="karib/û__vblex">
        <e><p><l>n</l><r><s n="plu"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>yî</l><r><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>û</l><r><s n="plu"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>m</l><r><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 

    <pardef n="dik/e__vblex">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="k/e__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef> 

    <pardef n="bik/e__vblex">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="k/e__vblex"/></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="fut"/></r></p><par n="k/e__vblex"/></e>
        <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>in</l><r><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 

   <pardef n="got/e__vblex">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="k/e__vblex"/></e>
        <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>in</l><r><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 

    <pardef n="dişo/__vblex">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="şo/__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef> 

    <pardef n="bişo/__vblex">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="şo/__vblex"/></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="fut"/></r></p><par n="şo/__vblex"/></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>n</l><r><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 

    <pardef n="bez/î__vblex">
        <e><p><l>îm</l><r><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>î</l><r><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>î</l><r><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>î</l><r><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>în</l><r><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>în</l><r><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>în</l><r><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> 
        <e><p><l>îme</l><r><s n="narr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>iye</l><r><s n="narr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ye</l><r><s n="narr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>îne</l><r><s n="narr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>îne</l><r><s n="narr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>îne</l><r><s n="narr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> 
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bez/î__vblex_iv">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="bez/î__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="nebez/î__vblex_iv">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="bez/î__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="nekir/î__vblex_tv">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="neg"/></r></p><par n="bez/î__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dibez/î__vblex_iv">
	<e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prog"/></r></p><par n="bez/î__vblex"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ruhvegerîn"><p><l>ruhveger</l><r>ruhvegerîn</r></p><par n="bez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="ruhvegerîn"><p><l>ruhvediger</l><r>ruhvegerîn</r></p><par n="dibez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="dagerîn"><p><l>dager</l><r>dagerîn</r></p><par n="bez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="dagerîn"><p><l>dadiger</l><r>dagerîn</r></p><par n="dibez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="hilgerîn"><p><l>hilger</l><r>hilgerîn</r></p><par n="bez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="hilgerîn"><p><l>hildiger</l><r>hilgerîn</r></p><par n="dibez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="tevgerîn"><p><l>tevger</l><r>tevgerîn</r></p><par n="bez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="tevgerîn"><p><l>tevdiger</l><r>tevgerîn</r></p><par n="dibez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="jêgerîn"><p><l>jêger</l><r>jêgerîn</r></p><par n="bez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="jêgerîn"><p><l>jêdiger</l><r>jêgerîn</r></p><par n="dibez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="bergerîn"><p><l>berger</l><r>bergerîn</r></p><par n="bez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="bergerîn"><p><l>berdiger</l><r>bergerîn</r></p><par n="dibez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="lêgerîn"><p><l>lêger</l><r>lêgerîn</r></p><par n="bez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="lêgerîn"><p><l>lêdiger</l><r>lêgerîn</r></p><par n="dibez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="libergerîn"><p><l>liberger</l><r>libergerîn</r></p><par n="bez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="libergerîn"><p><l>liberdiger</l><r>libergerîn</r></p><par n="dibez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="libergerîn" r="LR"><p><l>liber<b/>ger</l><r>libergerîn</r></p><par n="bez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="libergerîn" r="LR"><p><l>liber<b/>diger</l><r>libergerîn</r></p><par n="dibez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="wergerîn"><p><l>werger</l><r>wergerîn</r></p><par n="bez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="wergerîn"><p><l>werdiger</l><r>wergerîn</r></p><par n="dibez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="vegerîn"><p><l>veger</l><r>vegerîn</r></p><par n="bez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="vegerîn"><p><l>vediger</l><r>vegerîn</r></p><par n="dibez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="êşîn"><p><l>êş</l><r>êşîn</r></p><par n="bez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="êşîn"><p><l>diêş</l><r>êşîn</r></p><par n="dibez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="gerîn"><p><l>ger</l><r>gerîn</r></p><par n="bez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="gerîn"><p><l>diger</l><r>gerîn</r></p><par n="dibez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="zewicîn"><p><l>zewic</l><r>zewicîn</r></p><par n="bez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="zewicîn"><p><l>nezewic</l><r>zewicîn</r></p><par n="nebez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="zewicîn"><p><l>nazewic</l><r>zewicîn</r></p><par n="nebez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="zewicîn"><p><l>dizewic</l><r>zewicîn</r></p><par n="dibez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="bezîn"><p><l>bez</l><r>bezîn</r></p><par n="bez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="bezîn"><p><l>nebez</l><r>bezîn</r></p><par n="nebez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="bezîn"><p><l>nabez</l><r>bezîn</r></p><par n="nebez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="bezîn"><p><l>dibez</l><r>bezîn</r></p><par n="dibez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="herikîn"><p><l>herik</l><r>herikîn</r></p><par n="bez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="herikîn"><p><l>neherik</l><r>herikîn</r></p><par n="nebez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="herikîn"><p><l>naherik</l><r>herikîn</r></p><par n="nebez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="herikîn"><p><l>diherik</l><r>herikîn</r></p><par n="dibez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="kenîn"><p><l>ken</l><r>kenîn</r></p><par n="bez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="kenîn"><p><l>neken</l><r>kenîn</r></p><par n="nebez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="kenîn"><p><l>naken</l><r>kenîn</r></p><par n="nebez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="kenîn"><p><l>diken</l><r>kenîn</r></p><par n="dibez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="sekinîn"><p><l>sekin</l><r>sekinîn</r></p><par n="bez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="sekinîn"><p><l>nesekin</l><r>sekinîn</r></p><par n="nebez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="sekinîn"><p><l>nasekin</l><r>sekinîn</r></p><par n="nebez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="sekinîn"><p><l>disekin</l><r>sekinîn</r></p><par n="dibez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="guherîn"><p><l>guher</l><r>guherîn</r></p><par n="bez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="guherîn"><p><l>neguher</l><r>guherîn</r></p><par n="nebez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="guherîn"><p><l>naguher</l><r>guherîn</r></p><par n="nebez/î__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="şibîn"><p><l>neşib</l><r>şibîn</r></p><par n="nekir/î__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="şibîn"><p><l>naşib</l><r>şibîn</r></p><par n="nekir/î__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="kirîn"><p><l>nekir</l><r>kirîn</r></p><par n="nekir/î__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="kirîn"><p><l>nakir</l><r>kirîn</r></p><par n="nekir/î__vblex_tv"/></e>
